Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 27 Electronic Annual Reports

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 111, § 2, makes the chapter effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

§ 17-27-101.
Electronic filing of annual reports authorized; rules; penalty.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any entity required to file an annual report and pay an annual license fee under title 17 of the Wyoming statutes, may be authorized by rules of the secretary of state to file the annual report electronically and pay the annual license fee through credit card, electronic funds transfer or by other means. For each electronically transmitted annual report filed in the office of the secretary of state, the office shall assign a unique number to the filed report, create a record that bears the number assigned and the date and time of filing, and maintain the filed annual report for public inspection.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 3.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 111, § 1; 2008, ch. 91, § 3.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, repealed former (b) which read: “Any authorized person electronically submitting an annual report on behalf of an entity under this section which he knows, or should have known, is false in any material respect, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.”